Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.200

Mayor—Duties.

The mayor shall preside at meetings of the council, and be recognized as the head of the city or town for all ceremonial purposes and by the governor for purposes of military law.

He or she shall have no regular administrative duties, but in time of public danger or emergency, if so authorized by the council, shall take command of the police, maintain law, and enforce order.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2032; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.200. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 10; prior: 1943 c 271 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-17, part.]